Massachusetts, session 194th, H3310.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance is, within ninety days of the
passage of this bill, authorized and directed to complete a feasibility study and report regarding
the costs and benefits of constructing or leasing a post-conviction evidence retention facility in
Massachusetts.
In undertaking such study and completing said report, the Division shall consider the
possible multi-state utilization of such a facility, proximity to existing public safety or law
enforcement lab facilities, space for future expansion, privacy and security concerns, geographic
convenience, highway access, availability of town water and town sewer service, estimated
potential savings to the cities and towns of the Commonwealth, the advancement of criminal
of 2

justice in the Commonwealth, and such other matters as the Division deems helpful to the timely
completion of its report.
In conducting the study and in preparation of its report, the Division shall consult with
the Supreme Judicial Court, state or local bar associations, the Mass. Association of Criminal
Defense Attorneys, the District Attorneys of the Commonwealth, the Executive Office of Public
Safety, and the Mass. Municipal Association.
The Division shall file its report with the offices of the Senate President and the Speaker
of the House, the legislative Committees on State Administration, the Judiciary, Bonding and
Long-Term Debt, and the House and Senate Committees on Ways and Means.
of 2